Washington statutes.
RCW 10.95.010

Court rules.

No rule promulgated by the supreme court of Washington pursuant to RCW 2.04.190 and 2.04.200, now or in the future, shall be construed to supersede or alter any of the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1981 c 138 s 1.]